Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1210
Entity possessing or controlling remains or goods; request for return; duties.

Any institution, agency, organization, or other entity in this state which receives a request for the return of human skeletal remains or burial goods under the Unmarked Human Burial Sites and Skeletal Remains Protection Act shall, at least ninety days prior to the date for return established by statute or otherwise agreed upon pursuant to the act, provide the requesting relative or Indian tribe with an itemized inventory of any human skeletal remains and burial goods that are subject to return to the requesting relative or Indian tribe. At the time the entity transfers possession of such remains or goods to the requesting relative or Indian tribe, the transferor and the transferee shall each sign a transfer document which identifies by inventory number and description each human skeletal remain or burial good being transferred.

Laws 1989, LB 340, § 10.